Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.1241

School safety and security staff—Collected agreements and information.

(1) School districts must annually collect the following information on safety and security staff:

(a) Total number of safety and security staff working in the district and in each school building, and number of days per week that each staff works;

(b) The name of any law enforcement agency or private organization with which the district has an agreement for safety and security services;

(c) A description of each incident where safety and security staff were involved that resulted in student discipline, use of force against a student, or a student arrest. For each student involved in the incident, the description must include:

(i) The student's race, ethnicity, and other demographics; and

(ii) Whether the student has an individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973;

(d) The number of complaints related to job duties and student interactions filed against safety and security staff; and

(e) Other school safety and security information required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)(a) School districts must annually submit any agreements adopted as required by RCW 28A.320.1242 and the information collected as required by this section at the time and in the manner required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must make the submitted agreements and information publicly available. To the extent possible, information collected under subsection (1)(c) of this section must be disaggregated as provided in RCW 28A.300.042.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "safety and security staff" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.320.124.

[ 2021 c 38 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 38: See note following RCW 28A.400.345.